Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.030

General powers.

Each corporation shall have power:

(1) To have perpetual succession by its corporate name unless a limited period of duration is stated in its articles of incorporation.

(2) To sue and be sued, complain and defend, in its corporate name.

(3) To have a corporate seal which may be altered at pleasure, and to use the same by causing it, or a facsimile thereof, to be impressed or affixed or in any other manner reproduced.

(4) To purchase, take, receive, lease, take by gift, devise or bequest, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, be trustee of, improve, use and otherwise deal in and with real or personal property, or any interest therein, wherever situated.

(5) To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, transfer and otherwise dispose of all or any part of its property and assets.

(6) To lend money to its employees.

(7) To purchase, take, receive, subscribe for, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, vote, use, employ, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge, or otherwise dispose of, and otherwise use and deal in and with, shares or other interests in, or obligations of, other domestic or foreign corporations, whether for profit or not for profit, associations, partnerships or individuals, or direct or indirect obligations of the United States, or of any other government, state, territory, governmental district or municipality or of any instrumentality thereof.

(8) To make contracts and incur liabilities, borrow money at such rates of interest as the corporation may determine, issue its notes, bonds, and other obligations, and secure any of its obligations by mortgage or pledge of all or any of its property, franchises and income.

(9) To lend money for its corporate purposes, invest and reinvest its funds, and take and hold real and personal property as security for the payment of funds so loaned or invested.

(10) To conduct its affairs, carry on its operations, and have offices and exercise the powers granted by this chapter, in any state, territory, district, or possession of the United States, or in any foreign country.

(11) To elect or appoint officers and agents of the corporation, and define their duties and fix their compensation.

(12) To make and alter bylaws, not inconsistent with its articles of incorporation or with the laws of this state, for the administration and regulation of the affairs of the corporation.

(13) To establish and maintain reserve, equity, surplus or other funds, and to provide for the time, form and manner of distribution of such funds among members, shareholders or other persons with interests therein in accordance with the articles of incorporation.

(14) Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, to make donations for the public welfare or for charitable, scientific or educational purposes, and in time of war to make donations in aid of the United States and its war activities.

(15) To indemnify any director or officer or former director or officer of the corporation, or any person who may have served at its request as a director or officer of another corporation, against expenses actually and necessarily incurred by him or her in connection with the defense of any action, suit or proceeding in which he or she is made a party by reason of being or having been such director or officer, except for acts or omissions that involve intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law by the director or officer, or that involve a transaction from which the director or officer will personally receive a benefit in money, property, or services to which the director or officer is not legally entitled: PROVIDED, That such indemnification shall not be deemed exclusive of any other rights to which such director or officer may be entitled, under any bylaw, agreement, vote of board of directors or members or shareholders, or otherwise.

(16) To cease its corporate activities and surrender its corporate franchise.

(17) To have and exercise all powers necessary or convenient to effect any or all of the purposes for which the corporation is organized and not inconsistent with the articles of incorporation or the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2001 c 271 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 6.]

NOTES:

Indemnification of agents, insurance: RCW 23B.08.320, 23B.08.500 through 23B.08.580, 23B.08.600, and 23B.17.030.